data/giellatekno/gt-norm-yamls/N-katti_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

# This gold standard is automatically generated from the Votic dictionary
# at Språkbanken (https://spraakbanken.gu.se/karp/#?mode=votiska)

Tests:
  Noun - katti :   # should decline like the paradigm 'asKatti'
    katti+N+Sg+Nom: katti
    katti+N+Pl+Nom: katid
    katti+N+Sg+Gen: kati
    katti+N+Pl+Gen: kattijõ
    katti+N+Sg+Par: kattia
    katti+N+Pl+Par: [kattii, kattiitõ]
    katti+N+Sg+Ill: kattise
    katti+N+Pl+Ill: kattiise
    katti+N+Sg+Ine: kattiz
    katti+N+Pl+Ine: kattiiz
    katti+N+Sg+Ela: katisse
    katti+N+Pl+Ela: kattiisse
    katti+N+Sg+All: katille
    katti+N+Pl+All: kattiille
    katti+N+Sg+Ade: katil
    katti+N+Pl+Ade: kattiil
    katti+N+Sg+Abl: katilte
    katti+N+Pl+Abl: kattiilte
    katti+N+Sg+Tra: katissi
    katti+N+Pl+Tra: kattiissi
    katti+N+Sg+Ter: kattissaa
    katti+N+Pl+Ter: kattiissaa
    katti+N+Sg+Com: katika
    katti+N+Pl+Com: kattiika
